District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.05

Certificate of title required.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the owner of a vessel for which the District is the state of principal use shall deliver to the Harbor Master an application for a certificate of title for the vessel, with the applicable fee, not later than 20 days after the later of:

(1)

The date of a transfer of ownership; or

(2)

The date the District becomes the state of principal use.

(b)

An application for a certificate of title is not required for:

(1)

A documented vessel;

(2)

A foreign-documented vessel;

(3)

A barge;

(4)

A vessel before delivery if the vessel is under construction or completed pursuant to contract; or

(5)

A vessel held by a dealer for sale or lease.

(c)

The Harbor Master may not issue, transfer, or renew a certificate of number for a vessel issued pursuant to the requirements of 46 U.S.C. § 12301 unless the Harbor Master has created a certificate of title for the vessel, or an application for a certificate of title for the vessel and the applicable fee have been delivered to the Harbor Master.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 6, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.